Hawaii statutes.
§199-7 Search and seizure; forfeiture of
property. (a) Any police officer or agent of the department of land and
natural resources upon whom the board of land and natural resources has
conferred powers of police officers, shall have the authority to conduct
searches on probable cause as provided by law and to seize any equipment,
article, instrument, aircraft, vehicle, vessel, business records, or natural
resource used or taken in violation of the provisions contained in chapters 6D,
6E, and 6K, or title 12, or any rules adopted thereunder. For purposes of this
section, "natural resource" includes any archaeological artifacts,
minerals, any aquatic life or wildlife or parts thereof, including their eggs,
and any land plants or parts thereof, including seeds.

(b) Any equipment, article, instrument,
aircraft, vehicle, vessel, business records, or natural resource seized is
subject to forfeiture pursuant to chapter 712A. Unless otherwise directed by
the environmental court pursuant to chapter 712A, any item, other than a
natural resource, seized shall be ordered forfeited to the State for
disposition as determined by the department, or may be destroyed, or may be
kept and retained and utilized by the department or any other state agency. If
not needed or required by the department or other state agency, the forfeited
items shall be disposed of as provided by chapter 712A. Notwithstanding any
other law to the contrary, any live natural resource seized may be immediately
returned to its natural environment or suitable habitat or may be disposed of
as determined by the department; provided that if the natural resource disposed
of was unlawfully seized, the department shall be liable to the owner for the
fair market value of the items disposed of.

(c) The department of land and natural
resources shall compile a list of all equipment, articles, instruments,
aircraft, vehicles, vessels, or any natural resource forfeited as provided in
this section and shall publish the list in its annual report.

(d) Notwithstanding any other law to the
contrary, the department of land and natural resources may sell or take actions
to cause the sale of any perishable natural resource that is seized to prevent
the waste of the natural resource and to ensure the economic value of such
natural resource; provided that the department may not sell or cause the sale
of any threatened or endangered species or any other species whose sale is
prohibited by law. The department of land and natural resources may require
the person or persons who took the natural resources to sell the seized natural
resources at fair market value. The department of land and natural resources
may require any person purchasing any seized natural resource to deliver the
proceeds of the sale to the department of land and natural resources or its
authorized representative. Any person who refuses to sell the seized natural
resources at fair market value or any person who fails to deliver the proceeds
of the sale, as directed by the department of land and natural resources, shall
be in violation of this subsection and punishable as provided by law. The
department of land and natural resources shall deposit and keep the proceeds of
the sale in an interest bearing account until such time as the suspected
violation is settled between the person or persons who took the natural
resource, consignee or consignees, if any, and the department of land and
natural resources. Should a settlement not be reached, the department of land
and natural resources shall submit the proceeds of the sale to the environmental
court. The proceeds of the sale, after deducting any reasonable costs of the
sale incurred by the department of land and natural resources, shall be subject
to any administrative or judicial proceedings in the same manner as the seized
natural resource would have been, including an action in rem for the forfeiture
of the proceeds. Seizure and sale of a natural resource is without prejudice
to any other remedy or sanction authorized by law. [L 1978, c 171, pt of §1; am
L 1983, c 99, §1; am L 1985, c 222, §1; am L 1989, c 122, §1 and c 261, §9; am
L 1997, c 17, §4; am L 1998, c 2, §53; am L 1999, c 233, §1; am L 2004, c 142,
§14; am L 2014, c 218, §8]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next